Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2004).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 385 (2009).

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).